zh-CN: 键盘放大器输入: 1/4 英寸 TRS 平衡接口; 1/4 英寸 TS 乐器/线路接口; 3.5 毫米 Aux 输入接口; 蓝牙音频输入; 数字输入接口（S/PDIF/AES）; MIDI 输入接口; RCA 线路输入接口; 立体声左/右声道输入接口; USB 音频输入接口; XLR 麦克风/线路接口; 其他
nb: Innganger for keyboardforsterker: 1/4 tommer TRS balansert; 1/4 tommer TS instrument/linje; 3,5 mm aux-inngang; Bluetooth-lydinngang; Digital inngang (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI-inngang; RCA-linjeinngang; Stereo V/H-parinnganger; USB-lydinngang; XLR mikrofon/linje; Annet
de: Eingänge des Keyboardverstärkers: 1/4-Zoll-TRS symmetrisch; 1/4-Zoll-TS (Instrument/Line); 3,5-mm-Aux-In; Bluetooth-Audio-Eingang; Digitaler Eingang (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI-In; Cinch-Line-In; Stereo-L/R-Paar-Eingänge; USB-Audio-Eingang; XLR (Mic/Line); Sonstige
sk-SK: Vstupy zosilňovača pre klávesy: 1/4 palcový symetrický TRS; 1/4 palcový nástrojový/linkový TS; 3,5 mm vstup Aux; Zvukový vstup Bluetooth; Digitálny vstup (S/PDIF/AES); Vstup MIDI; Linkový vstup RCA; Párové stereo vstupy Ľ/P; Zvukový vstup USB; XLR mikrofónový/linkový; Iné
th: อินพุตแอมพลิฟายเออร์คีย์บอร์ด: TRS บาลานซ์ 1/4 นิ้ว; TS อินสตรูเมนต์/ไลน์ 1/4 นิ้ว; Aux in ขนาด 3.5 มม.; อินพุตเสียงบลูทูธ; อินพุตดิจิทัล (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI in; RCA line in; อินพุตสเตอริโอคู่ L/R; อินพุตเสียง USB; XLR ไมค์/ไลน์; อื่นๆ
da: Tastaturforstærkerindgange: 1/4 tomme TRS-balanceret; 1/4 tomme TS-instrument/linje; 3,5 mm aux ind; Bluetooth-lydindgang; Digital indgang (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI ind; RCA-linje ind; Stereo L/R-par indgange; USB-lydindgang; XLR-mikrofon/linje; Andet
sv: Ingångar för tangentbordsförstärkare: 6,35 mm (1/4 tum) TRS balanserad; 6,35 mm (1/4 tum) TS instrument/linje; 3,5 mm aux in; Bluetooth-ljudingång; Digital ingång (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI in; RCA-linjeingång; Stereo L/R-paringångar; USB-ljudingång; XLR-mikrofon/linje; Övrigt
en: Keyboard amplifier inputs: 1/4 in TRS balanced; 1/4 in TS instrument/line; 3.5 mm aux in; Bluetooth audio input; Digital input (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI in; RCA line in; Stereo L/R pair inputs; USB audio input; XLR mic/line; Other
bg-BG: Входове за усилвател на клавиатура: 1/4 инча балансиран TRS; 1/4 инча инструментален/линеен TS; 3,5 мм Aux вход; Bluetooth аудио вход; Цифров вход (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI вход; RCA линеен вход; Стерео L/R двойка входове; USB аудио вход; XLR микрофонен/линеен; Друго
pl: Wejścia wzmacniacza klawiszowego: Zbalansowane TRS 1/4"; Liniowe/instrumentalne TS 1/4"; Wejście AUX 3,5 mm; Wejście audio Bluetooth; Wejście cyfrowe (S/PDIF/AES); Wejście MIDI; Wejście liniowe RCA; Stereofoniczna para wejść L/P; Wejście audio USB; Liniowe/mikrofonowe XLR; Inne
ja: キーボードアンプ入力: 1/4 インチ TRS バランス; 1/4 インチ TS インストゥルメント/ライン; 3.5 mm Aux 入力; Bluetooth オーディオ入力; デジタル入力 (S/PDIF / AES); MIDI 入力; RCA ライン入力; ステレオ L/R ペア入力; USB オーディオ入力; XLR マイク/ライン; その他
nl: Keyboardversterker ingangen: 1/4 inch TRS gebalanceerd; 1/4 inch TS instrument/lijn; 3,5 mm aux-in; Bluetooth-audio-ingang; Digitale ingang (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI in; RCA-lijningang; Stereo L/R-ingangen; USB-audio-ingang; XLR mic/lijn; Anders
sl-SI: Vhodi ojačevalnika za klaviature: 1/4 in TRS balansiran; 1/4 in TS instrumentalni/linijski; 3,5 mm AUX-vhod; Zvočni vhod Bluetooth; Digitalni vhod (S/PDIF/AES); Vhod MIDI; Linijski vhod RCA; Vhodi stereo para (levi/desni); Zvočni vhod USB; Mikrofonski/linijski XLR; Drugo
lt-LT: Klavišinio stiprintuvo įvestys: 1/4 col. TRS (balansuota); 1/4 col. TS instrumentams / linijai; 3,5 mm „Aux in“; „Bluetooth“ garso įvestis; Skaitmeninė įvestis (S/PDIF/AES); „MIDI in“; RCA linijinė įvestis; Stereofoninės (K / D) porinės įvestys; USB garso įvestis; XLR mikrofonui / linijai; Kita
ru: Входы усилителя для клавишных: 1/4 дюйма TRS (балансный); 1/4 дюйма TS (инструментальный/линейный); Вход AUX 3,5 мм; Аудиовход Bluetooth; Цифровой вход (S/PDIF/AES); Вход MIDI; Линейный вход RCA; Стереовходы (Л/П); Аудиовход USB; Микрофонный/линейный XLR; Другое
cs: Vstupy zesilovače kláves: 1/4" TRS symetrický; 1/4" TS nástrojový/linkový; 3,5mm Aux in; Audio vstup Bluetooth; Digitální vstup (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI in; Linkový vstup RCA; Vstupy pro stereo pár L/P; Audio vstup USB; XLR mikrofonní/linkový; Jiné
pt-PT: Entradas do amplificador de teclado: TRS balanceado de 1/4 pol.; TS de instrumento/linha de 1/4 pol.; Entrada auxiliar de 3,5 mm; Entrada de áudio Bluetooth; Entrada digital (S/PDIF/AES); Entrada MIDI; Entrada de linha RCA; Entradas de par estéreo E/D; Entrada de áudio USB; Microfone/linha XLR; Outro
fi: Kosketinsoittimen vahvistimen tulot: 1/4 tuuman tasapainotettu TRS; 1/4 tuuman TS-instrumentti/linja; 3,5 mm:n aux-tulo; Bluetooth-äänitulo; Digitaalinen tulo (S/PDIF / AES); MIDI-tulo; RCA-linjatulo; Stereo L/R -paritulot; USB-äänitulo; XLR mikrofoni/linja; Muu
hu: Billentyűzet erősítő bemenetek: 1/4 colos szimmetrikus TRS; 1/4 colos TS hangszer/vonal; 3,5 mm-es aux bemenet; Bluetooth audiobemenet; Digitális bemenet (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI-bemenet; RCA-vonalbemenet; Sztereó B/J páros bemenetek; USB audiobemenet; XLR mikrofon/vonal; Egyéb
es: Entradas del amplificador del teclado: TRS balanceada de 1/4 pulg.; TS de instrumento/línea de 1/4 pulg.; Entrada auxiliar de 3,5 mm; Entrada de audio Bluetooth; Entrada digital (S/PDIF/AES); Entrada MIDI; Entrada de línea RCA; Entradas de par estéreo I/D; Entrada de audio USB; Micrófono/línea XLR; Otra
tr: Klavye amplifikatörü girişleri: 1/4 inç dengeli TRS; 1/4 inç TS enstrüman/hat; 3,5 mm aux girişi; Bluetooth ses girişi; Dijital giriş (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI girişi; RCA hat girişi; Stereo Sol/Sağ çift girişler; USB ses girişi; XLR mikrofon/hat; Diğer
vi: Đầu vào bộ khuếch đại bàn phím: Cân bằng TRS 1/4 in; Thiết bị/Line TS 1/4 in; Đầu vào aux 3,5 mm; Đầu vào âm thanh Bluetooth; Đầu vào kỹ thuật số (S/PDIF/AES); Đầu vào MIDI; Đầu vào line RCA; Đầu vào stereo trái/phải; Đầu vào âm thanh USB; Đầu vào XLR mic/line; Khác
zh-TW: 鍵盤擴大機輸入: 1/4 吋 TRS 平衡; 1/4 吋 TS 樂器/線路; 3.5 公釐 Aux In; 藍牙音訊輸入; 數位輸入 (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI In; RCA Line In; 立體聲 L/R 雙輸入; USB 音訊輸入; XLR 麥克風/線路; 其他
it: Ingressi dell'amplificatore per tastiera: Bilanciato TRS da 1/4 in; Strumento/linea TS da 1/4 in; Ingresso aux da 3,5 mm; Ingresso audio Bluetooth; Ingresso digitale (S/PDIF/AES); Ingresso MIDI; Ingresso di linea RCA; Ingressi stereo L/R in coppia; Ingresso audio USB; Mic/linea XLR; Altro
ko: 키보드 앰프 입력: 1/4인치 TRS 밸런스드; 1/4인치 TS 악기/라인; 3.5mm Aux 입력; 블루투스 오디오 입력; 디지털 입력(S/PDIF/AES); MIDI 입력; RCA 라인 입력; 스테레오 L/R 페어 입력; USB 오디오 입력; XLR 마이크/라인; 기타
pt-BR: Amplificador de teclado entradas: TRS de 1/4 pol. balanceado; Instrumento/linha TS de 1/4 pol.; Entrada aux de 3,5 mm; Entrada de áudio Bluetooth; Entrada digital (S/PDIF/AES); Entrada MIDI; Entrada de linha RCA; Par de entradas estéreo E/D; Entrada de áudio USB; Mic/linha XLR; Outras
ro-RO: Intrări de amplificator pentru claviatură: 1/4 in TRS echilibrat; 1/4 in TS instrument/linie; Intrare aux de 3,5 mm; Intrare audio Bluetooth; Intrare digitală (S/PDIF/AES); Intrare MIDI; Intrare de linie RCA; Intrări pereche stereo S/D; Intrare audio USB; XLR microfon/linie; Altele
fr: Entrées de l’amplificateur pour clavier: TRS 1/4 po symétrique; TS instrument/ligne 1/4 po; Entrée auxiliaire 3,5 mm; Entrée audio Bluetooth; Entrée numérique (S/PDIF/AES); Entrée MIDI; Entrée ligne RCA; Entrées paires stéréo G/D; Entrée audio USB; Mic/ligne XLR; Autre
el: Είσοδοι ενισχυτή πλήκτρων: Συμμετρικό TRS 1/4 in; TS οργάνου/γραμμής 1/4 in; Aux in 3,5 mm; Είσοδος ήχου Bluetooth; Ψηφιακή είσοδος (S/PDIF/AES); Είσοδος MIDI; Είσοδος γραμμής RCA; Στερεοφωνικό ζεύγος εισόδων L/R; Είσοδος ήχου USB; XLR μικροφώνου/γραμμής; Άλλο
hr-HR: Ulazi za pojačalo tipkovnice: 1/4 inča TRS (balansirano); 1/4 inča TS instrument / linijski; 3,5 mm aux ulaz; Bluetooth audio ulaz; Digitalni ulaz (S/PDIF/AES); MIDI ulaz; RCA linijski ulaz; Stereo L/D par ulaza; USB audio ulaz; XLR mikrofon/linijski; Ostalo